Maine, session 132, LD403.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §6111, sub-§1-A, ¶G, as amended by PL 2015, c. 36, §1, is
further amended to read:
G. Where mediation is available as set forth in section 6321‑A, a statement that a
mortgagor may request mediation to explore options for avoiding foreclosure
judgment; and
Sec. 2. 14 MRSA §6111, sub-§1-A, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 36, §2, is
amended to read:
H. A statement that the total amount due does not include any amounts that become
due after the date of the notice.; and
Sec. 3. 14 MRSA §6111, sub-§1-A, ¶I is enacted to read:
I. The following warning: "WARNING: Be cautious when seeking financial
assistance, a loan modification or any other agreement to cure or work out the default.
Criminals have been known to pose as legitimate negotiators who work with banks to
provide assistance to distressed borrowers, but these criminals may instead take your
money and private information without providing any assistance. You are encouraged
to seek help from a housing counselor who works for a housing counseling agency
approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD)
or from an attorney licensed to practice in the State of Maine."
Sec. 4. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 1 - 132LR0093(03)